North Carolina, session 2025, HB493.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 120 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 7E.
"Safe Workplace Act.
"§ 120-36.25. Legislative findings; scope; definitions.
(a) The General Assembly finds that early reporting and intervention are most effective
in resolving actual or perceived incidents of improper workplace behavior, and the General
Assembly encourages the prompt reporting of incidents or concerns so that rapid and constructive
action can be taken before relationships become irreparably strained and before offensive conduct
continues or escalates. The General Assembly encourages good-faith reporting of all perceived
incidents of improper workplace behavior, regardless of the offender's identity or position.
(b) This Article applies to legislators, regular, full-time, part-time, temporary, and
contractual employees of the General Assembly, as well as unpaid volunteers and pages. In
addition, this Article applies to the interaction of these individuals away from the legislative
complex at legislature-sponsored events, professional meetings and seminars, and all activities
that involve legislative business.
(c) As used in this Article, sexual harassment means unwelcome sexual advances,
requests for sexual favors, and other verbal, nonverbal, or physical contact of a sexual nature and
exists when:
(1) Submission to such conduct is made either explicitly or implicitly a term or
condition of an individual's employment.
(2) Submission to or rejection of such conduct by an individual is used as a basis
for employment decisions affecting such individual.
(3) Exposure to such conduct has the purpose or effect of unreasonably interfering
with an individual's work performance or creating an intimidating, hostile, or
offensive working environment, which is perceived by the victim to be
abusive or hostile.
*H493-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 120-36.26. Mandatory workplace harassment prevention policies and education.
(a) No later than December 31, 2025, the Legislative Services Commission (LSC) and
the Legislative Ethics Committee (LEC) shall jointly develop, adopt, and implement "zero
tolerance" policies regarding sexual harassment, abuse, misconduct, gender bias, and all other
forms of improper workplace behaviors. The policies developed under this section shall be
incorporated by reference into each chamber's permanent rules.
(b) The policies required under this section shall include all of the following:
(1) Mandatory annual ethics training for all legislators, legislative officers, and
legislative employees of the General Assembly. The training will focus on the
identification and prevention of sexual harassment, abuse, misconduct, gender
bias, and all other forms of discrimination in the workplace.
(2) Effective and clear sanctions for incidents of sexual harassment, abuse,
misconduct, gender bias, and all other forms of discrimination in the
workplace. The sanctions shall be applicable to all legislators, legislative
officers, and legislative employees.
(3) A complaint and investigation process as provided in G.S. 120-36.27.
"§ 120-36.27. Reporting and investigation.
(a) An individual who believes the individual has been the subject of or has witnessed
improper workplace behavior should discuss the individual's concerns with any one of the
following: the head of the Human Resources Office, the independent third party retained pursuant
to G.S. 120-36.28, or the person designated by the majority and minority leaders of each
chamber. The person who receives the report shall take steps to resolve the problem informally.
(b) If the problem is not resolved informally to the satisfaction of the individual who
made the report, the person who received the report will promptly refer the matter to the
independent third party retained pursuant to G.S. 120-36.28 to conduct an investigation of the
complaint. All information will be maintained on a confidential basis to the greatest extent
possible. Only those who need to know in order to accomplish the purpose of the investigation
shall be provided with the identity of the complainant and the allegations. All parties, including
the complainant and the alleged harasser, contacted in the course of an investigation shall be
advised of the necessity of confidentiality and that any breach of confidentiality shall be treated
as misconduct subject to disciplinary action.
(c) Adverse actions taken in retaliation against an individual for reporting sexual
harassment or other unlawful discrimination or for participating in an investigation of a claim of
harassment or discrimination constitute a serious violation of this Article and will be subject to
disciplinary action.
"§ 120-36.28. Independent third party.
The LSC shall contract with an independent third party to provide the following services
related to implementation of this Article:
(1) Confidential information and advice to individuals who report improper
workplace behavior under G.S. 120-36.27(a).
(2) Investigative support and advice to the designated employee receiving and
investigating reports of misconduct.
(3) Investigative actions under G.S. 120-36.27(b).
"§ 120-36.29. Resolution.
(a) In order to facilitate an appropriate resolution, any report involving a legislator or
staff to a legislator will be brought to the attention of the relevant presiding officer as well as the
relevant minority leader. Any report involving an employee of the LSC will be promptly brought
to the attention of the Legislative Services Officer. If the investigation supports a finding of a
violation of this Article, prompt and effective remedial action will be taken. Responsive action
may include training, referral to counseling, or disciplinary action as determined to be appropriate
under the circumstances, including referral to the LEC. Disciplinary action for a non-legislator
Page 2 House Bill 493-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
may include warning, reprimand, withholding of a promotion or pay increase, reassignment,
temporary suspension without pay, termination, or other punishment. Disciplinary action for a
legislator may include warning, reprimand, reassignment, expulsion, or other punishment in
accordance with Section 20 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution.
(b) If the investigation does not support a finding that this policy has been violated, the
individual making the report and the individual against whom the allegation was made shall be
so advised. Both will be advised that retaliation for making the report is prohibited.
"§ 120-36.30. Appeal.
If a party involved in the reported incident does not agree with its resolution, that party may
appeal to the appropriate Presiding Officer within 10 days of receiving notice about resolution of
the complaint. Within 45 days, the Presiding Officer or designee will render a decision on the
appeal."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the General Assembly,
Legislative Services Commission, the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for
the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 fiscal years to be used to implement this act. The funds shall be
allocated as follows:
(1) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for literature, documents, and training
materials required for developing an infrastructure for a mandatory yearly
ethics training program that focuses on the identification and prevention of
sexual harassment, abuse, misconduct, gender bias, and other forms of
workplace discrimination.
(2) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for contractual services required
under Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 493-First Edition Page 3